Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1426
Franchise; termination; additional; application; hearing; continuance.

If the board finds it desirable it may upon request continue the date of hearing for a period of ninety days, and may upon application, but not ex parte, continue the date of hearing for an additional period of ninety days.

Laws 1971, LB 768, § 26.